Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-709
Sickness and accident insurance, defined.

The term sickness and accident insurance as used in sections 44-710 to 44-767 shall mean insurance against loss or expense resulting from the sickness of the insured, from the bodily injury or death of the insured by accident, or both.

Laws 1947, c. 164, § 1, p. 452;

Laws 1957, c. 188, § 1, p. 642;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 129.